Vermont, session 2025-2026, H637.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 1201 is amended to read:
§ 1201. OPERATING VEHICLE UNDER THE INFLUENCE OF
ALCOHOL OR OTHER SUBSTANCE; CRIMINAL REFUSAL;
ENHANCED PENALTY FOR BAC OF 0.16 OR MORE
* * *
(h) As used in subdivision subdivisions (a)(2) and (a)(3) of this section,
“under the influence of a drug” means that a person’s ability to operate a motor
VT LEG #386311 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.637
2026 Page 2 of 5
vehicle safely is diminished or impaired in the slightest degree mental or
physical abilities are diminished, impaired, or affected in the slightest degree
by alcohol, a drug other than alcohol, or a combination of alcohol and another
drug. This subsection shall not be construed to affect the meaning of the term
“under the influence of alcohol.”
* * *
(j) A person suspected of violating this section shall submit to the
collection of an evidentiary blood or saliva sample when a warrant for that
person’s blood or saliva is issued pursuant to subdivision 1202(f)(1) of this
title. This subsection shall not be construed as impairing a person’s right to
challenge the validity of a search warrant in any subsequent legal proceedings.
Sec. 2. 23 V.S.A. § 1202 is amended to read:
§ 1202. CONSENT TO TAKING OF TESTS TO DETERMINE BLOOD
ALCOHOL CONTENT OR PRESENCE OF OTHER DRUG
(a)(1) Implied consent. Every person who operates, attempts to operate, or
is in actual physical control of any vehicle on a highway in this State is deemed
to have given consent to an evidentiary test of that person’s breath for the
purpose of determining the person’s alcohol concentration or the presence of
other drug in the blood. The test shall be administered at the direction of a law
enforcement officer.
VT LEG #386311 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.637
2026 Page 3 of 5
(2) Blood test. If breath testing equipment is not reasonably available or
if the officer has reason to believe that the person is unable to give a sufficient
sample of breath for testing or if the law enforcement officer has reasonable
grounds to believe that the person is under the influence of a drug other than
alcohol or a combination of alcohol and another drug, the person is deemed to
have given consent to the taking of an evidentiary sample of blood. If in the
officer’s opinion the person is incapable of decision or unconscious or dead, it
is deemed that the person’s consent is given and a sample of blood shall be
taken. A blood test sought pursuant to this subdivision shall be obtained
pursuant to subsection (f) of this section.
* * *
Sec. 3. 23 V.S.A. § 1210 is amended to read:
§ 1210. PENALTIES
* * *
(b) First offense. A person who violates section 1201 of this title may be
fined not more than $750.00 or imprisoned for not more than two years, or
both.
(c) Second offense. A person convicted of violating who violates section
1201 of this title who has been convicted of another violation of that section
within the last 20 years preceding the date of the second violation shall be
fined not more than $1,500.00 or imprisoned not more than two years, or both.
VT LEG #386311 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.637
2026 Page 4 of 5
At least 80 hours of community service shall be performed, or 60 consecutive
hours of the sentence of imprisonment shall be served and may not be
suspended or deferred or served as a supervised sentence, except that credit for
a sentence of imprisonment may be received for time served in a residential
alcohol facility pursuant to sentence if the program is successfully completed.
(d) Third offense. A person convicted of violating who violates section
1201 of this title who has previously been convicted two times of a violation of
that section, including at least one violation conviction within the last 20 years
preceding the date of the third violation, shall be fined not more than $2,500.00
or imprisoned not more than five years, or both. At least 96 consecutive hours
of the sentence of imprisonment shall be served and may not be suspended or
deferred or served as a supervised sentence, except that credit for a sentence of
imprisonment may be received for time served in a residential alcohol facility
pursuant to sentence if the program is successfully completed. The court may
impose a sentence that does not include a term of imprisonment or that does
not require that the 96 hours of imprisonment be served consecutively only if
the court makes written findings on the record that such a sentence will serve
the interests of justice and public safety.
(e) Fourth or subsequent offense.
(1) A person convicted of violating who violates section 1201 of this
title who has previously been convicted three or more times of a violation of
VT LEG #386311 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.637
2026 Page 5 of 5
that section, including at least one violation conviction within the last 20 years
preceding the date of the fourth violation, shall be fined not more than
$5,000.00 or imprisoned not more than 10 years, or both. At least 192
consecutive hours of the sentence of imprisonment shall be served and may not
be suspended or deferred or served as a supervised sentence, except that credit
for a sentence of imprisonment may be received for time served in a residential
alcohol treatment facility pursuant to sentence if the program is successfully
completed. The court shall not impose a sentence that does not include a term
of imprisonment unless the court makes written findings on the record that
there are compelling reasons why such a sentence will serve the interests of
justice and public safety.
* * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386311 v.1